dictsource/nl_rules
       
.group ge
          _) ge (@P2      Q@
             ge (bied     Q@
          _) gebruikers (@P10 Q@br'Wyk@rs
          _) gee          Qe:
          _) gei          QEI
          _) ge (kC       QE
             gener (aal   Q,e:n@r
          _) gelijk       Q@lEIk
          _) gemeente (@P8 Q@m'e:nt@
             genre        ZA~r@
          _) ge (lC       QE
          _) ge (rC       QE
          _) ge (lenL02   Qe:
          _) ge (tenL02   Qe:
          _) geu          QY:
          _) ge (ven      Qe:
             ge (vend_    Qe:
             ge (ver      Qe:
             ge (val      Q@
             ge (ving     Qe:

             ge (sprek    Q@  // in compounds

             

.group h
             h            h
          C) h (K

          C) hand (_S4    h'Ant
          _) handicap     hEndikEp
          _) her (@P3     hEr
          _) her (der     hEr
          _) her (ds      hEr
          _) her (en      hI:r
          _) herfst (@P6  h'Erfst
          _) herinn       h%ErIn   // herinneren
          _) hersen       h'Ers@n
          &) heid (_S4    hEIt
          _) honden (@P6  h'Ond@n
          _) hoogte (@P6  h'o:xt@
          _) hulp (@@P4   h'8lp


.group i
             i            i
             ij (+        EI
             i (CK        I
             i (x         I
             ie           i
             ieuw         iw
             iee          ie:
             ii           i

          d) ie (_        'i
          g) ie (_        'i
          m) ie (_        'i
          p) ie (_        'i
         ss) ie (_        =i
          s) ië (_        =i@
             ieus (_      ij'Y:s
             ieuze (_     ij'Y:z@
             ieuzer (_    ij'Y:z@r
             ieuzere (_   ij'Y:z@r@
             ieust (_     ij'Y:st
             ieuste (_    ij'Y:st@
          @) ibel (_      'ib@l
          @) ibele (_     'ib@l@
          &) ica (_       =ika:
          &) ici (_       =isi
          &) ico (_       =iko:
          &) icus (_      =ik8s
          r) ice (_       'is@
          r) ices (_      'is@s
             i (che_      i
             ie (X        'i
             ie (Ce_      'i
             ie (Cen_     'i
             ie (Cer_     'i
             ie (Cere_    'i
             ie (Cste_    'i
             ie (CjeX_    'i
             ie (CtjeX_   'i
             ie (ren_     'i
             ie (rd_      'i
             iën (_       'i@n
       CAns) ie (_        =i
       CAss) ie (_        =i
          @) ig (_S2dq    =@Q
          @) ige (_S1m     @
          _) ige (_       @Q@   // when a prefix is removed, eg "herfstige"
          @) igen (_      =@Q@n
          @) iger (_      =@Q@r
          @) igere (_     =@Q@r@
          @) igst (_      =@Qst
          @) igste (_     =@Qst@
             ij (_        'EI
             ij (e_       'EI
          @) ij (n_       'EI
             ij (tjeX     'EI
             ij (en       'EI
          &) ika (_       =ika:
          &) iko (_       =iko:
        fam) i (lie       'i
          _) in (C@P2     'In
          _) in (a@P2     'In
          _) ing (eC_      IN   // bewerkingen
          _) in (do        In
          _) in (forma     In
             ine (_       'in@
             ines (_      'in@s
          _) informatie (@P10 InfOrm'a:tsi
          _) inn (er      'In    // ?? inneren
          _) inn (ig       In
          _) inter        Int@r
             io (nage     iO
             io (de_       i'o:
             iodes (_      i'o:d@s
          _) in (scrip     In
             is (_        Is
          @) isch (_      =is
          @) ische (_     =is@
          @) isme (_      'Ism@
          @) ist (_       'Ist
          @) isten (_     'Ist@n
         Ar) ia (_        =ia:
         Ar) ium (_       =i8m

.group j
             j            j
         
          _) jaar (@P4    j'a:r
             jaar (lijk   ja:r
             jou (rna     Zu


.group k
             k            k
          k) k
             k (d         g

         _) kale (nde     ka:l'E
         _) kantoor (@P7  kAnt'o:r
         _) keuze (@P5    k'Y:z@
         _) kinder (@P6   k'Ind@r
            kokkerel      kOk@r'El 
         _) koning        k'o:nIN  // in compounds
         _) koningin      ko:nIQ'In
         _) krediet (@P7  kr@d'it


.group l
             l            l
          l) l
          &) lijk (_S4    l@k
          &) lijken (_S6  l@k@n
          &) lijker (_S6  l@k@r
          &) lijkere (_S7  l@k@r@
          &) lijkheid (_S8 l@khEIt
          &) lijkheden (_S9 l@khe:d@n
//          &) lijks@ (_    l@ks@
          &) lijkst (_S6  l@kst
          &) lijkste (_S7  l@kst@

          &) laan (_S4    la:n
          _) lange (@P5   laN@
          _) land (@P4    l'And
          _) land (e      l'And
          _) lente (@P5   l'Ent@
          _) liefdes (@P7 l'ifd@s
      detai) ll
          @) loog (_      lo:x
          @) loos (_S4    lo:s
          @) loze (_S4    lo:z@
          @) lozen (_S5   lo:z@n



.group m
             m            m
          m) m

            management    ma:nIdZm@nt
         _) mee (@P3      m'e:
         _) mee (rC       mI:
            menu (_       m@ny
         _) mi (cro       mi
         _) milieu        mIlj'Y:
         _) mi (s@        m%I
         _) mis (anC      miz
         _) mis (commP3   m'Is
         _) mis (daP3     m'Is
         _) mis (è        miz
         _) mis (g@P3     m'Is
         _) mis (ge@P3    m'Is
         _) mis (gun      m%Is
         _) mis (in@P3    m'Is
         _) mis (kleuP3   m'Is
         _) mis (liepP3   m'Is
         _) mis (loP3     m'Is
         _) mis (tA       m'Is
         _) misver (@     m'Isf@r
         _) muziek (@P6   myz'ik

.group n
             n            n
          n) n
             ng           N
             nj           n^
             n (k         N
             n (g$w_alt3  n
             n (k$w_alt3  n

          _) na (C@@P2    n'a:
          _) na (C@N      n'a:
          _) na (C%       nA
          _) na (cht      nA
          _) najaars (@P7 n'a:ja:rs
          _) narci (s     n%ArsI
          _) na (rc       n%A
          _) na (der      na:
          _) na (tion     na:
          _) nano (@P4    n'a:no:
          _) na (polA     n%a:
             napoleon     n%a:po:l@jOn
          _) natuur       na:t'yr
             na (tur      n%a:
             na (vig      n%a:
             na (burig    n%a:    // naburig(e)
             na (delig    n%a:    // nadelig(e)
             na (latig    n%a:    // nalatig(e)
             na (malig    n%a:    // namalig(e)
          _) navigatie (@P9 na:viQ'a:tsi
          _) na (vr       na:
          _) na (volg@    n%a:
          _) nieuws (@P6  n'iws
         @@) nis (_S3    nIs
         @@) nisen (_S5  nIs@n
          _) noord (@P5   no:rd
          _) notitie (@P7 no:t'itsi


.group o
             o            o:
             o (CK        O
             o (x         O
             o (r         o:
             oo (r        O:     // ?? or just for word-final "oor" ?
             ooi          o:j
             oo           o:
             oe           u
             oei          uj
             ou           VU
             ouw          VU
             ou (rage     u

        @@C) o (_         =o:
             obsc (u      opsk
             oe (X_       'u
             office       Of@s
             oir (_       'v#a:r
         pl) oi (t        v#A
          c) oi (ffu      v#A
         pr) o (gram      o:
             omgeving     OmQ'e:vIN
             on (_        'On
             onen (_      'On@n
             oo (X        'o:
             oon          'o:n  // in compounds, eg. telefoongesprek
             oo (C_       'o:
          _) oost (@P4    o:st
          _) op (@@P2     'Op
          _) open (@P4    'o:p@n
          _) op (enen+    'o:p
          _) openings (P8 'o:p@nINs
          _) op (era      'o:p
          _) opper        Op@r
          _) op (tion     Op
             os (_        Os
             ou (che_     u
             ouch (en_    uS
          d) ou (blu      u
          c) ou (pu       u
         tr) ou (vail     u
             ouve (rtu    uvE
          _) over (@P4    ,o:v@r
          _) overigen     o:v@r@Q@n
          _) overheid     'o:v@rhEIt
        enth) ousia       uZ'A
           t) ou  (r      u:


.group on
          _) on (@P2      %On
          _) onaan (@P5   On'a:n
          _) onder (@P5   'Ond@r
          _) onge (@P4    ,OnQ@
          _) ont (@P3     Ont
          _) on (te@P2    On        // onterecht
          _) onder        Ond@r

          _) ong (aarn    ,OnQ'
          _) ong (ans     ,OnQ'
          _) ong (rijpbaar  ,OnQ'
          _) ong (rond    ,OnQ'
          _) ong (unstig  ,OnQ'
          _) ong (uur     ,OnQ'

          _) onge (diert  OnQ@   // stress on 'on', not after 'ge'
          _) onge (loof   OnQ@
          _) onge (luk    OnQ@
          _) onge (mak    OnQ@
          _) onge (nade   OnQ@
          _) onge (rief   OnQ@
          _) onge (val    OnQ@




.group p
             p            p
          p) p
          _) ph           f
             ph (K        f

             parach (ut   p,a:ra:S
          _) politie (@   po:l'itsi
          _) politiek     po:lit'ik
          @)  programma (_S7    o:QrAmma



.group q
             q            k
             qu           kv
          @) qu (eer      k
          @) qu (eren_    k
          @) que (_       k


.group r
             r            r
          A) r (A         r
          C) r (A         r
             rr          *r

             route        rut@  // route(s)

.group re
          _) re (geren    r@
          _) re (geer     r@
          _) regel        re:Q@l
          _) re (cent     r@
          _) re (cept     r@
          _) re (ceptief  re:
          _) re (ces      r@
          _) re (clam     r@
          _) redactie (P8   r@d'Aksi
          _) register     r@Q'Ist@r
             reme (die    r@m'e:
          _) re (serve_   r@
          _) re (cord     re'
          _) regering     r@Q'I:rIN
             repre (saill re:pre:
             recherch     r@SErS
             revanch      r@vA~nS


.group s
             s            s
             s (s
          A) s (A         z
             s (b         z
             s (d         z
             sc (e        s
             sc (i        s
             sch          sx
             sch (_       s
             sch (e_      s
             sch (er_     s
          _) sch (n       S
          _) sh           S
             sh (K        S
             sj           S
          @) sje (_       sj@
          @) s (_S1       s
          a) s (_         s
          @) s (_$w_alt   =s

          _) samen(@P5    s'a:m@n
          _) scan (L02    skEn
             science      saI@ns
             sc (oop      sk
             sc (opi      sk
          &) sel (_       =s@l
          &) selen (_     =s@l@n
             service      s8v@s
             sh (op       S
          @) si (o        S
          A) si (o        Z
          @) ssi (o       S
        CAr) sie (_       =zi

          _) sport (@P5   sp'Ort
          _) stads (@P5   st'Ats
          _) stage (@P5   st'a:Z@
          _) standaard (@P9 st'Anda:rt
          _) start (@P5   st'Art
          @) straat (_S6 stra:t
       _vre) s (e         s
